Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1805.01
Metropolitan transit authority; retirement plan reports; duties.

(1) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each December 31 thereafter, the chairperson of the board shall file with the Public Employees Retirement Board an annual report on each retirement plan established pursuant to section 14-1805 and section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and shall submit copies of such report to the members of the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature. The annual report shall be in a form prescribed by the Public Employees Retirement Board and shall contain the following information for each such retirement plan:

(a) The number of persons participating in the retirement plan;

(b) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(c) Plan assets and liabilities;

(d) The names and positions of persons administering the plan;

(e) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(f) The form and nature of investments;

(g) For each defined contribution plan, a full description of investment policies and options available to plan participants; and

(h) For each defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits of participants in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a benefit, and the total present value of such members' benefits, as well as the funding sources which will pay for such benefits.

If a plan contains no current active participants, the chairperson may file in place of such report a statement with the Public Employees Retirement Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing benefits, and the sources and amount of funding for such benefits.

(2) Beginning December 31, 1998, and every four years thereafter, if such retirement plan is a defined benefit plan, the authority shall cause to be prepared a quadrennial report and the chairperson shall file the same with the Public Employees Retirement Board and submit to the members of the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature a copy of such report. The report shall consist of a full actuarial analysis of each such retirement plan established pursuant to section 14-1805. The analysis shall be prepared by an independent private organization or public entity employing actuaries who are members in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, and which organization or entity has demonstrated expertise to perform this type of analysis and is unrelated to any organization offering investment advice or which provides investment management services to the retirement plan.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 4.